North Carolina statutes. Chapter 55D. Filings, Names, and Registered Agents for Corporations, Nonprofit Corporations, and Partnerships.
Article 2. Submission of Documents to the Secretary of State for Filing.
§ 55D-17.
Evidentiary effect of copy of filed document.

A certificate attached to a copy of a document filed by the Secretary of State, bearing the Secretary of State’s signature and the seal of office (both of which may be in facsimile or in any electronic form approved by the Secretary of State) and certifying that the copy is a true copy of the document, is conclusive evidence that the original document is on file with the Secretary of State. A photographic, microfilm, optical disk media, or other reproduced copy of a document filed under this Chapter, Chapter 55, 55A, 55B, 57D, or 59 of the General Statutes, or any predecessor law, when certified by the Secretary, shall be considered an original for all purposes and is admissible in evidence in like manner as an original.

History.

1955, c. 1371, s. 1; 1989, c. 265, s. 1; 1995, c. 539, s. 3; 2001-358, ss. 3(b), 4; 2001-387, ss. 173, 175(a); 2001-413, s. 6; 2013-157, s. 10.

Official Comment to Former G.S. 55-1-27

Editor’s Note.
— The Official Comments below were formerly located under G.S. 55-1-27 prior to its transfer in 2001. At the request of the Revisor of Statutes, the Official Comments have been transferred to this section as historical annotations pursuant to Session Laws 2001-358, s. 52.

The secretary of state may be requested to certify that a specific document has been filed with him upon payment of the fees specified in section 1.22(c). Section 1.27 provides that the certificate is conclusive evidence only that the original document is on file. The limited effect of the certificate is consistent with the ministerial filing obligation imposed on the secretary of state under the Model Act.

North Carolina Commentary to Former G.S. 55-1-27

Editor’s Note.
— The North Carolina Commentary below was formerly located under G.S. 55-1-27 prior to its transfer in 2001. At the request of the Revisor of Statutes, the North Carolina Commentary has been transferred to this section as historical annotations pursuant to Session Laws 2001-358, s. 52.

This section makes the Secretary of State’s certificate of a document conclusive that the original is on file in his office. It differs from former G.S. 55-169, which made such certificate “prima facie” evidence of the facts stated in the certificate and in the certified document.

The section differs from the Model Act by inserting the requirement that the Secretary of State certify that the attached copy of the document is a true copy and by providing for the use of the Secretary of State’s seal rather than the State seal.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2001-358, ss. 3(b) and 4, effective January 1, 2002, and applicable to documents submitted for filing on or after that date, recodified G.S. 55-1-27 as this section; substituted “and the seal of office (both of which may be in facsimile or in any electronic form approved by the Secretary of State)” for “(which may be in facsimile) and the seal of office” in the first sentence, and substituted “under this Chapter, Chapter 55, 55A, 55B, 57C, or 59 of the General Statutes, or any predecessor law” for “pursuant to this Chapter or any predecessor act” in the final sentence.

Session Laws 2013-157, s. 10, effective January 1, 2014, substituted “57D” for “57C” in the last sentence.

§ 55D-18.
Penalty for signing false document.

A person commits an offense if the person signs a document the person knows is false in any material respect with intent that the document be delivered to the Secretary of State for filing.

An offense under this section is a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

1989, c. 265, s. 1; 1993, c. 539, s. 439; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 2001-358, ss. 3(b), 4; 2001-387, ss. 173, 175(a); 2001-413, s. 6.

Official Comment to Former

G.S. 55-1-29

Editor’s Note.
— The Official Comments below were formerly located under

G.S. 55-1-29

prior to its transfer in 2001. At the request of the Revisor of Statutes, the Official Comments have been transferred to this section as historical annotations pursuant to Session Laws 2001-358, s. 52.

Section 1.29 makes it a criminal offense for any person to sign a document that he knows is false in any material respect with intent that the document be submitted for filing to the secretary of state.

Section 1.29(b) is keyed to the classification of offenses provided by the Model Penal Code. If a state has not adopted this classification, the dollar amount of the fine should be substituted for the misdemeanor classification.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2001-358, ss. 3(b) and 4, effective January 1, 2002, and applicable to documents submitted for filing on or after that date, recodified

G.S. 55-1-29

as this section; and substituted “the person” for “he” in two places in subsection (a).

§ 55D-19.

Reserved for future codification purposes.